Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1730
Deputy sheriffs; classified service; chief deputy sheriff.

For purposes of sections 23-1721 to 23-1736, all deputy sheriffs actually serving as such shall comprise the classified service. The chief deputy sheriff shall not be within the classified service, but a deputy sheriff serving with permanent rank under sections 23-1721 to 23-1736 may be designated chief deputy sheriff and retain such rank during the period of his or her service as chief deputy sheriff and shall upon termination of his or her duties as chief deputy sheriff revert to his or her permanent rank.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 10, p. 645;

Laws 2003, LB 222, § 8.